Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 3. Candidates and Their Campaign Committees.
§ 24.2-947.11.
Special report required of certain large pre-legislative session contributions.

Any candidate for a statewide office or the General Assembly shall, not later than January 15, file a report with the State Board of any single contribution in excess of $1,000, or any combination of contributions with an aggregate value in excess of $1,000 from a single person, that is knowingly received or reported by the candidate or his treasurer on behalf of his candidacy during the period beginning January 1 and ending on the day immediately before the first day of a regular session of the General Assembly. This report shall be filed as provided in §

24.2-947.5

, and the report shall be received by the State Board not later than January 15.

Any contribution reported pursuant to subsection A shall not be required to be reported on any subsequent report required by this article following the date of the contribution.

History.

2020, c. 770, §

24.2-947.10

; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 343.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2020 acts having been §

24.2-947.10

.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 343, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection A, which formerly read: “Any single contribution of $1,000 or more for a statewide office or the General Assembly knowingly received or reported by the candidate or his treasurer on behalf of his candidacy during the period beginning January 1 and ending on the day immediately before the first day of a regular session of the General Assembly shall be reported as provided in §

24.2-947.5

, and the report shall be received by the State Board not later than January 15”; and in subsection B, substituted “not be required to be reported on any subsequent” for “also be reported on the first.”

§ 24.2-948.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 696, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-948

, relating to Special reports required of certain large contributions received by members of county boards of supervisors and city and town councils, was enacted by 2004, c. 411, § 24.2-919.1; 2005, c. 676; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2008, c. 380.

§ 24.2-948.1.
Exemption from reporting requirements for certain candidates for local office and for directors of soil and water conservation districts.

This section shall apply to candidates for local office and for director of soil and water conservation districts. A candidate for local office or for director of a soil and water conservation district may seek an exemption from the requirements for filing campaign finance disclosure reports set out in this chapter except for the filing requirements of §§

24.2-945.2

,

24.2-947.1

,

24.2-947.9

, and

24.2-948.4

pertaining to certain independent expenditures, the statement of organization, large contributions, and the filing of a final report. The request for an exemption shall be filed with the general registrar of the county or city where the candidate resides on a form prescribed by the State Board and in accordance with instructions by the State Board for the time for filing and the process for approval by the general registrar.

To qualify for an exemption, the candidate shall certify on the form that (i) he has not and will not solicit or accept any contribution from any other person or political committee during the course of his campaign, (ii) he has not and will not contribute to his own campaign more than $1,000, (iii) he has not and will not expend more than $1,000 in the course of his campaign, and (iv) that he has complied and will comply with the requirements of this chapter. This certification shall apply for the duration of the campaign until the filing of a final report in compliance with §

24.2-948.4

after the election. A candidate may rescind his certification and exemption at any time during the campaign and shall file in accordance with the appropriate filing schedule thereafter, provided that the candidate rescinds his certification prior to engaging in the activities described in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection. The first report filed shall account for all prior contributions and expenditures pertaining to his campaign.

Any candidate who has qualified for an exemption from reporting requirements pursuant to this section shall not be permitted to qualify for any office, enter upon the duties thereof, or receive any salary or emoluments therefrom until a final report has been filed that details all financial activity of the candidate’s campaign and states that all reporting for the nomination and election is complete and final. No officer authorized by the laws of the Commonwealth to issue certificates of election shall issue one to any person determined to be elected to any such office, until copies of the final report cited above have been filed as required in this chapter.

A candidate who has a current exemption under the provisions of this section, or who is otherwise exempt from reporting contributions and expenditures under this chapter, may purchase voter lists from the State Board under the provisions of §§

24.2-405

and

24.2-406

with a check drawn on the candidate’s personal account.

History.

2001, c. 794, § 24.2-906.1; 2005, c. 384; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2010, c. 696; 2015, cc. 644, 645; 2020, c. 772.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 696 deleted “24.2-948,” following “24.2-947.9” in subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” twice in the last sentence of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 772, in subsection A, inserted “and for director of soil and water conservation districts” in the first sentence and “or for director of a soil and water conservation district” in the second sentence

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-948.2.
Reports as condition to qualification for office.

No person shall be permitted to qualify for any office, enter upon the duties thereof, or receive any salary or emoluments therefrom until he has filed the campaign finance reports required in subdivisions A 3 through A 9 of §

24.2-947.6

; subdivisions A 3 through A 6 of §

24.2-947.7

; and subdivisions B 1 and B 2 of §

24.2-947.8

, as applicable; and a final report if required by subsection C of §

24.2-948.1

; and has responded to and complied with any notice that additional information is required to complete a report in compliance with §

24.2-953.3

. No person shall be permitted to qualify for any office, enter upon the duties thereof, or receive any salary or emoluments therefrom until he has paid any civil penalty and returned any contribution required to be returned pursuant to §

24.2-953.5

. No officer authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to issue certificates of election shall issue one to any person determined to be elected to any such office, until copies of the reports cited above have been filed as required in this article.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection A, a person who is elected to fill a vacancy at a special election held on a general election day may qualify for the office and be issued a certificate of election in advance of filing the postelection report required to be filed under subdivision A 9 of §

24.2-947.6

in the case of a November election, or under subdivision A 6 of §

24.2-947.7

in the case of a May election, upon the filing of a postelection report complete through the election day.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-260; 1972, c. 620; 1982, c. 650; 1986, c. 558; 1988, c. 734; 1993, c. 641, § 24.2-922; 1995, c. 785; 1999, c. 120; 2005, c. 384; 2006, cc. 771, 787, 805, 892; 2008, c. 650.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 amended former § 24.2-922, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Acts 2006, c. 789, amended former § 24.2-922, from which this section is derived. The amendments were substantially incorporated in §

24.2-948.2

as enacted by Acts 2006, cc. 787 and 892.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 771 and 805 are identical, and inserted the second sentence in subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 650, effective March 21, 2008, substituted “subdivisions A 3 through A 6” for “subdivisions A 1, A 2, and A” in subsection A; and substituted “A 6” for “A 3” near the end in subsection B.

§ 24.2-948.3.
Compliance with reporting requirements of campaign finance disclosure act as requirement of candidacy for certain offices.

It shall be a requirement of candidacy in any election for statewide office or the General Assembly that the candidate shall have filed the disclosure reports required by this chapter for any election in which he participated as a candidate for any such office and which was held within the five years preceding the date of the election in which he seeks to be a candidate. For the purposes of this section, the candidate shall be presumed to have complied with the candidate disclosure reporting requirements unless (i) the State Board or general registrar, whichever is appropriate, has notified the candidate, at least 60 days prior to the applicable deadline for him to file his written statement of qualification set out in §

24.2-503

, that he has failed to file a required report or reports and (ii) the candidate fails to file the specified report or reports by the applicable deadline for filing his written statement of qualification.

The authority of the State Board to grant an extension of the deadline established in §

24.2-503

shall include the authority to grant such extension with respect to the requirements of this section.

History.

1994, c. 752, §

24.2-503.1

; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2015, cc. 644, 645.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical and substituted “general registrar” for “local electoral board” in clause (ii) of subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 45.

§ 24.2-948.4.
Final report requirement; disbursement of surplus funds.

A final report shall be filed by every campaign committee which sets forth (i) all receipts and disbursements not previously reported, (ii) an accounting of the retirement of all debts, and (iii) the disposition of all surplus funds as provided in subsection D. The final report shall include a termination statement, signed by the candidate, that all reporting for the campaign committee is complete and final. Once a campaign committee’s final report has been filed, no further report relating to that election shall be required.

A final report shall be required when (i) a candidate no longer seeks election to the same office in a successive election, (ii) a candidate seeks election to a different office, or (iii) the candidate is deceased.

If the candidate is deceased, the final report shall be filed and signed by the treasurer. If the candidate was serving as his own treasurer, his executor shall file and sign the final report. Any excess contributed funds shall be disposed of pursuant to the provisions of subsection D.

Amounts received by a candidate or his campaign committee as contributions that are in excess of the amount necessary to defray his campaign expenditures may be disposed of only by one or any combination of the following: (i) transferring the excess for use in a succeeding election or to retire the deficit in a preceding election; (ii) returning the excess to a contributor in an amount not to exceed the contributor’s original contribution; (iii) donating the excess to any organization described in § 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code; (iv) contributing the excess to one or more candidates or to any political committee that has filed a statement of organization pursuant to this chapter; (v) contributing the excess to any political party committee; and (vi) defraying any ordinary, nonreimbursed expense related to his elective office. It shall be unlawful for any person to convert any contributed moneys, securities, or like intangible personal property to his personal use or to the use of a member of the candidate’s “immediate family” as that term is defined in § 30-101.

History.

1986, c. 558, § 24.1-257.2; 1988, c. 734; 1990, c. 931, § 24.1-258.1; 1991, c. 709; 1993, c. 641, §§ 24.2-920, 24.2-921; 2000, c. 233; 2003, c. 248; 2004, c. 457; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2009, c. 231.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 231 added the language beginning “or to the use of a member” at the end of the last sentence in subsection D.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

§ 24.2-948.5.
Reviews of campaign finance reports and records.

The Department shall have the authority to review the reports and records of the campaign committees. The purposes of the review shall be to (i) reconcile the balance in the campaign depository with the amounts reported in the candidate’s reports of receipts and expenditures and (ii) review the reports for mathematical accuracy and facial completeness including the reporting of specific information required by law. In the performance of its review, the Department is authorized to request the production of monthly bank statements for, and copies of checks issued on, campaign depositories and itemized bills, invoices, and receipts for any expenditure of campaign funds in an amount greater than $500.

The Department shall review the reports and records of the campaign committees within 180 days following the general election. The Department shall review the reports and records of all of the campaign committees for candidates, including losing primary candidates, for statewide office; 10 percent of the campaign committees for candidates, including losing primary candidates, for the Senate and House of Delegates; and one percent of candidates, including losing primary candidates, for all other offices in any year in which such offices are elected. The State Board shall meet publicly to select the campaign committees to be reviewed by a drawing that ensures selection on a random basis.

No review shall be conducted of a campaign committee for any office that has received less than $25,000 in contributions during the campaign, including the transfer of surplus funds from a prior campaign. Campaign committees for candidates that are exempt from review pursuant to this subsection shall not be included in the drawing provided for in subsection B or counted in determining the number that equals the relevant percentage of the campaign committees to be reviewed.

In the performance of its duties under this section, the Department may employ the services of additional personnel to the extent that appropriated funds are available to the Department for such purpose.

The Department shall make a report of the results of its reviews available to the State Board, the Governor, and the General Assembly by July 1 of each year following the election year for the office to which the review pertains and the same shall be posted to the Department’s website.

History.

2022, c. 258.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 258, cl. 2 provides: “That campaign finance reports filed prior to January 1, 2024, shall not be subject to the provisions of this act, and the provisions of this act shall not be effective until January 1, 2024.”